Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Division 4. Unsafe Motor Vehicles

§ 31-5-970.
Required safe mechanical condition.

No person shall drive or move on the highway any vehicle, including vehicles referenced in W.S. 31-5-901(c), unless the equipment upon the vehicle is in good working order and adjustment as required in this act and unless the vehicle is in such safe mechanical condition as not to endanger the driver or other occupant or any person upon the highway.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 231, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 31-214.2; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).